Utah statutes.
53-3-510.   Instructors certified to administer skills tests.

(1) (a)  The division shall establish procedures and standards to certify licensed instructors of driver training courses under this part to administer skills tests.

(b)  An instructor may not administer a skills test under this section to a student that took the course from the same school or the same instructor.

(2)  The division is the certifying authority.

(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1), an instructor certified under this section may give skills tests designed for driver training courses authorized under this part.

(b)  The division shall establish minimal standards for the test that is at least as difficult as those required to receive a class D operator's license under Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver License Act.

(c)  A student who fails the skills test given by an instructor certified under this section may apply for a class D operator's license under Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 2, Driver Licensing Act, and complete the skills test at a division office.

(4)  A student who successfully passes the test given by a certified driver training instructor under this section satisfies the driving parts of the test required for a class D operator's license.

(5)  The division shall establish procedures to enable licensed commercial driver training schools to administer or process the skills test authorized under this section for a class D operator's license.

(6)  The division shall establish the standards and procedures required under this section by rules made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

